incubator/apertium-lt-en.lt.dix
    <pardef n="personal_pronouns__prn">
      <!-- Singular -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aš</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>manęs</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>man</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mane</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>manimi</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>manyje</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tu</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tavęs</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tau</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tave</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tavimi</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tavyje</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jis</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jo</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jam</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jį</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>juo</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jame</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ji</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jos</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jai</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ją</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ja</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>joje</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- Dual -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mudu</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mudviejų</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mudviem</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mudu</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mudviem</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mudviese</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mudvi</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mudviejų</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mudviem</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mudvi</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mudviem</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mudviese</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>judu</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>judviejų</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>judviem</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>judu</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>judviem</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>judviese</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>judvi</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>judviejų</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>judviem</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>judvi</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>judviem</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>judviese</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>juodu</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>jiedu</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jųdviejų</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jiedviem</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>juodu</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>

    <e lm="personal pronouns"><i/><par n="personal_pronouns__prn"/></e>
